Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1694HV (2) 91 lh/ko H.F. 379 Section 1. MEDICAL RESIDENCY POSITIONS AND AUDITION 1 CLINICALS ââ MEDICAL STUDENTS AND APPLICANTS MEETING CERTAIN 2 CRITERIA ââ ANNUAL REPORT. 3 1. The university of Iowa hospitals and clinics shall offer 4 an interview for an available medical residency position to 5 any applicant who has a residency specialty in obstetrics and 6 gynecology, psychiatry, general surgery, emergency medicine, 7 neurology, or primary care, or an available cardiology 8 fellowship position to any applicant who has a fellowship 9 specialty in cardiology, and who also is a resident of Iowa, 10 attended and earned an undergraduate degree from an Iowa 11 college or university, or attended and earned a medical degree 12 from a medical school in Iowa. 13 2. The university of Iowa hospitals and clinics shall 14 submit a report to the governor and the general assembly by 15 January 15, annually, regarding the interviews as specified 16 in this section during the prior fiscal year. Specifically, 17 the report shall include for each interview the name of the 18 applicantâs medical school, whether an applicant was offered 19 and participated in an interview, whether the applicant was 20 accepted for one of the residency or fellowship positions, 21 and the total number of available residency and fellowship 22 positions filled by an applicant meeting the criteria under 23 this section. 24